Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,177.01
Solid Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund; applicant, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-15,177 to 81-15,179, applicant shall mean any political subdivision which owns or operates or has previously owned or operated a landfill or any entity which owns or operates or has previously owned or operated a licensed landfill in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 1022, § 2.